Connecticut, session 2026, HB05309.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 19a-601 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
(a) Prior to the performance of an abortion upon a minor, a physician
or counselor shall provide pregnancy information and counseling in
accordance with this section in a manner and language that will be
understood by the minor. The physician or counselor shall:
(1) Explain that the information being given to the minor is being
given objectively and is not intended to coerce, persuade or induce the
minor to choose to have an abortion or to carry the pregnancy to term;
(2) Explain that the minor may withdraw a decision to have an
abortion at any time before the abortion is performed or may reconsider
a decision not to have an abortion at any time within the time period
during which an abortion may legally be performed;
LCO No. 1880 1 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5309
(3) Explain to the minor the alternative choices available for
managing the pregnancy, including: (A) Carrying the pregnancy to term
and keeping the child, (B) carrying the pregnancy to term and placing
the child for adoption, placing the child with a relative or obtaining
voluntary foster care for the child, and (C) having an abortion, and
explain that public and private agencies are available to assist the minor
with whichever alternative she chooses and that a list of these agencies
and the services available from each will be provided if the minor
requests;
(4) Explain that public and private agencies are available to provide
birth control information and that a list of these agencies and the
services available from each will be provided if the minor requests;
[(5) Discuss the possibility of involving the minor's parents, guardian
or other adult family members in the minor's decision-making
concerning the pregnancy and whether the minor believes that
involvement would be in the minor's best interests; and]
(5) Explain and carry out the following notification procedures to
parents, legal guardians or others:
(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision, notice
shall be provided to at least one parent or legal guardian of a pregnant
unemancipated minor not less than forty-eight hours prior to the
performance of an abortion upon such minor. Such notice may be
provided by the physician or counselor providing information and
counseling; and
(B) If a pregnant unemancipated minor declares in a signed written
statement that she is a victim of sexual abuse, neglect or physical abuse
by either of her parents or her legal guardian, the physician or counselor
providing counseling shall provide the notice required pursuant to
subparagraph (A) of this subdivision to such minor's brother or sister
who is aged twenty-one years or older or a stepparent or grandparent
specified by such minor or, if no such person exists, to some other
LCO No. 1880 2 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5309
person who is aged twenty-one years or older specified by such minor;
and
(6) Provide adequate opportunity for the minor to ask any questions
concerning the pregnancy, abortion, child care and adoption, and
provide information the minor seeks or, if the person cannot provide the
information, indicate where the minor can receive the information.
(b) After the person provides the information and counseling to a
minor as required by this section, such person shall have the minor sign
and date a form stating that:
(1) The minor has received information on alternatives to abortion
and that there are agencies that will provide assistance and that a list of
these agencies and the services available from each will be provided if
the minor requests;
(2) The minor has received an explanation that the minor may
withdraw an abortion decision or reconsider a decision to carry a
pregnancy to term;
(3) The alternatives available for managing the pregnancy have been
explained to the minor;
(4) The minor has received an explanation about agencies available
to provide birth control information and that a list of these agencies and
the services available from each will be provided if the minor requests;
(5) The minor [has discussed with the person providing the
information and counseling the possibility of involving the minor's
parents, guardian or other adult family members in the minor's
decision-making about the pregnancy] received an explanation of the
parental notification requirements pursuant to subdivision (5) of
subsection (a) of this section;
(6) If applicable, the minor has determined that not involving the
minor's parents, guardian or other adult family members is in the
LCO No. 1880 3 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5309
minor's best interests; and
(7) The minor has been given an adequate opportunity to ask
questions.
(c) The person providing the information and counseling shall also
sign and date the form and shall include such person's business address
and business telephone number. The person shall keep a copy for such
minor's medical record and shall give the form to the minor or, if the
minor requests and if such person is not the attending physician,
transmit the form to the minor's attending physician. Such medical
record shall be maintained as otherwise provided by law.
(d) The provision of pregnancy information and counseling by a
physician or counselor which is evidenced in writing containing the
information and statements provided in this section and which is signed
by the minor shall be presumed to be evidence of compliance with the
requirements of this section.
(e) (1) No health care provider, authorized to perform an abortion
pursuant to section 19a-602, shall perform an abortion upon a minor
until the written statement required pursuant to subparagraph (A) of
subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this section, certifying that the
physician or counselor providing the information and counseling under
subsection (a) of this section has provided notice to at least one parent
or legal guardian of such minor, is received. If the health care provider
performing the abortion receives a signed statement pursuant to
subparagraph (B) of subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this section, such
physician shall certify in the minor's medical record that such health
care provider has received such statement. Any health care provider
100 relying in good faith on such statement shall not be civilly or criminally
101 liable for failure to give the notice required pursuant to subparagraph
102 (A) of subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this section.
103 (2) The minor may petition a court for a waiver of the notice
104 requirements pursuant to subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of this section
LCO No. 1880 4 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5309
105 and may participate in proceedings on her own behalf. The petition shall
106 include a statement that the minor is pregnant and unemancipated. The
107 petition shall also include a statement that such notice requirements
108 have not been waived by the parent or legal guardian and that the minor
109 wishes to obtain an abortion without giving such required notification.
110 The court shall appoint a guardian for the minor.
111 (A) If the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the
112 minor is both sufficiently mature and well-informed to decide whether
113 to have an abortion, the court shall issue an order authorizing the minor
114 to consent to the performance of an abortion without such required
115 notification. If the court does not make the finding specified in this
116 subparagraph or in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision, it shall dismiss
117 the petition.
118 (B) If the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that there
119 is a pattern of physical, sexual or emotional abuse of the minor by one
120 or both of her parents or her legal guardian, or that the notification of a
121 parent or legal guardian is not in the best interest of the minor, the court
122 shall issue an order authorizing the minor to consent to the performance
123 of an abortion without such required notification. If the court does not
124 make the finding specified in this subparagraph or in subparagraph (A)
125 of this subdivision, it shall dismiss the petition.
126 [(e)] (f) The requirements of this section shall not apply when, in the
127 best medical judgment of the physician based on the facts of the case
128 before him, a medical emergency exists that so complicates the
129 pregnancy or the health, safety or well-being of the minor as to require
130 an immediate abortion. A physician who does not comply with the
131 requirements of this section by reason of this exception shall state in the
132 medical record of the abortion the medical indications on which his
133 judgment was based.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO No. 1880 5 of 6

Raised Bill No. 5309
Section 1 from passage 19a-601